Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF145.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2072XS (2) 91 ll/ns S.F. 145 Section 1. Section 99G.34, subsection 5, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 5. Player name and address lists, provided that the names 3 and addresses of prize winners shall not be withheld except as 4 provided in subsection 5A . 5 Sec. 2. Section 99G.34, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 6 following new subsection: 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 5A. a. Names, addresses, and all 8 personally identifiable information of prize winners, if the 9 prize awarded is one million dollars or more, and the prize 10 winner who elects to remain anonymous specifies that choice at 11 the time of claiming the lottery prize. However, if the prize 12 winner who elects to remain anonymous is a legal entity that 13 possesses or has applied for a federal employer identification 14 number as issued by the federal internal revenue service, the 15 authorized representative claiming the lottery prize on behalf 16 of the entity must have a legal interest in the entity and 17 specify the choice of the entity to remain anonymous at the 18 time of claiming the lottery prize. 19 b. For purposes of this subsection, the amount of a lottery 20 prize is determined by the total amount of prize money paid 21 to a prize winner for a single lottery prize claim before 22 deducting any federal tax withholdings or other deductions 23 required by law. 24 c. A prize winnerâs choice to remain anonymous under this 25 subsection does not prohibit the division from requiring, for 26 claim validation and lottery prize processing purposes, certain 27 government-issued identification, including but not limited 28 to a driverâs license, social security card, or passport, of 29 the individual who is a prize winner, or the federal employer 30 identification number as issued by the federal internal revenue 31 service for a prize winner that is a legal entity. 32 d. This subsection does not apply to a prize winner that 33 chooses to receive payment of the prize in installments over 34 a period of years. 35 -1- LSB 2072XS (2) 91 ll/ns 1/ 3 S.F. 145 e. This subsection does not apply to a release of only the 1 prize winnerâs city or county of residence. 2 f. This subsection does not apply to a release of a prize 3 winnerâs personally identifiable information to the department 4 of health and human services or as otherwise authorized or 5 required by law. 6 Sec. 3. Section 99G.34, subsection 6, Code 2025, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 6. Operational Building plans and operational security 9 measures, systems, or procedures and building plans , including 10 but not limited to security plans and procedures of the 11 commission designed to ensure the integrity and security of 12 lottery operations, and information that ensures the integrity 13 and security of the selection process for winning tickets or 14 numbers, other than general information about that process . 15 Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY. The following apply to lottery prize 16 claims occurring on or after January 1, 2026: 17 1. The section of this Act amending section 99G.34, 18 subsection 5. 19 2. The section of this Act enacting section 99G.34, 20 subsection 5A. 21